New Jersey, session 221, S3958.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.         The Department of the Treasury is authorized to sell and convey, as surplus real property, all of the States right, title, and interest in and to the property located at 200 Sanatorium Road, former Building 33, known as East Hall, of the Hagedorn Psychiatric Hospital in the Township of Lebanon, Hunterdon County, which contains 57,462± square feet of land and improvements also known as Block 9, Lot 7 on the tax map of the Township of Lebanon.  The property shall be sold and conveyed to GShack Group, LLC for the appraised value of $570,000. b.    The sale and conveyance authorized by subsection a. of this section shall be executed in accordance with the terms and conditions approved by the State House Commission. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.